Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.3903

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 209.

*This 1969 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions and shall take effect on July 1, 1969.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 45. Formerly RCW 41.26.920.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "This 1969 amendatory act," see note following chapter digest.